extensions/1013418_russian-english-dictionary/russian_english_dictionary-1.1/dictionaries/Russian-English_Bilingual.aff
SFX 364 Y 141
SFX 364 овать овать .
SFX 364 овать ую .
SFX 364 овать уем .
SFX 364 овать уешь .
SFX 364 овать уете .
SFX 364 овать ует .
SFX 364 овать уют .
SFX 364 овать овал .
SFX 364 овать овала .
SFX 364 овать овало .
SFX 364 овать овали .
SFX 364 овать ую .
SFX 364 овать уем .
SFX 364 овать уешь .
SFX 364 овать уете .
SFX 364 овать ует .
SFX 364 овать уют .
SFX 364 овать уя .
SFX 364 овать овав .
SFX 364 овать овавши .
SFX 364 овать уем .
SFX 364 овать уемте .
SFX 364 овать уй .
SFX 364 овать уйте .
SFX 364 овать ующий .
SFX 364 овать ующего .
SFX 364 овать ующему .
SFX 364 овать ующего .
SFX 364 овать ующий .
SFX 364 овать ующим .
SFX 364 овать ующем .
SFX 364 овать ующая .
SFX 364 овать ующей .
SFX 364 овать ующей .
SFX 364 овать ующую .
SFX 364 овать ующей .
SFX 364 овать ующею .
SFX 364 овать ующей .
SFX 364 овать ующее .
SFX 364 овать ующего .
SFX 364 овать ующему .
SFX 364 овать ующее .
SFX 364 овать ующим .
SFX 364 овать ующем .
SFX 364 овать ующие .
SFX 364 овать ующих .
SFX 364 овать ующим .
SFX 364 овать ующих .
SFX 364 овать ующие .
SFX 364 овать ующими .
SFX 364 овать ующих .
SFX 364 овать овавший .
SFX 364 овать овавшего .
SFX 364 овать овавшему .
SFX 364 овать овавшего .
SFX 364 овать овавший .
SFX 364 овать овавшим .
SFX 364 овать овавшем .
SFX 364 овать овавшая .
SFX 364 овать овавшей .
SFX 364 овать овавшей .
SFX 364 овать овавшую .
SFX 364 овать овавшей .
SFX 364 овать овавшею .
SFX 364 овать овавшей .
SFX 364 овать овавшее .
SFX 364 овать овавшего .
SFX 364 овать овавшему .
SFX 364 овать овавшее .
SFX 364 овать овавшим .
SFX 364 овать овавшем .
SFX 364 овать овавшие .
SFX 364 овать овавших .
SFX 364 овать овавшим .
SFX 364 овать овавших .
SFX 364 овать овавшие .
SFX 364 овать овавшими .
SFX 364 овать овавших .
SFX 364 овать уемый .
SFX 364 овать уемого .
SFX 364 овать уемому .
SFX 364 овать уемого .
SFX 364 овать уемый .
SFX 364 овать уемым .
SFX 364 овать уемом .
SFX 364 овать уем .
SFX 364 овать уемая .
SFX 364 овать уемой .
SFX 364 овать уемой .
SFX 364 овать уемую .
SFX 364 овать уемой .
SFX 364 овать уемою .
SFX 364 овать уемой .
SFX 364 овать уема .
SFX 364 овать уемое .
SFX 364 овать уемого .
SFX 364 овать уемому .
SFX 364 овать уемое .
SFX 364 овать уемым .
SFX 364 овать уемом .
SFX 364 овать уемо .
SFX 364 овать уемые .
SFX 364 овать уемых .
SFX 364 овать уемым .
SFX 364 овать уемых .
SFX 364 овать уемые .
SFX 364 овать уемыми .
SFX 364 овать уемых .
SFX 364 овать уемы .
SFX 364 овать ованный .
SFX 364 овать ованного .
SFX 364 овать ованному .
SFX 364 овать ованного .
SFX 364 овать ованный .
SFX 364 овать ованным .
SFX 364 овать ованном .
SFX 364 овать ован .
SFX 364 овать ованная .
SFX 364 овать ованной .
SFX 364 овать ованной .
SFX 364 овать ованную .
SFX 364 овать ованной .
SFX 364 овать ованною .
SFX 364 овать ованной .
SFX 364 овать ована .
SFX 364 овать ованное .
SFX 364 овать ованного .
SFX 364 овать ованному .
SFX 364 овать ованное .
SFX 364 овать ованным .
SFX 364 овать ованном .
SFX 364 овать овано .
SFX 364 овать ованные .
SFX 364 овать ованных .
SFX 364 овать ованным .
SFX 364 овать ованных .
SFX 364 овать ованные .
SFX 364 овать ованными .
SFX 364 овать ованных .
SFX 364 овать ованы .
SFX 364 овать 0 .

SFX 365 Y 141
SFX 365 овать овать .
SFX 365 овать ую .
SFX 365 овать уем .
SFX 365 овать уешь .
SFX 365 овать уете .
SFX 365 овать ует .
SFX 365 овать уют .
SFX 365 овать овал .
SFX 365 овать овала .
SFX 365 овать овало .
SFX 365 овать овали .
SFX 365 овать ую .
SFX 365 овать уем .
SFX 365 овать уешь .
SFX 365 овать уете .
SFX 365 овать ует .
SFX 365 овать уют .
SFX 365 овать уя .
SFX 365 овать овав .
SFX 365 овать овавши .
SFX 365 овать уем .
SFX 365 овать уемте .
SFX 365 овать уй .
SFX 365 овать уйте .
SFX 365 овать ующий .
SFX 365 овать ующего .
SFX 365 овать ующему .
SFX 365 овать ующего .
SFX 365 овать ующий .
SFX 365 овать ующим .
SFX 365 овать ующем .
SFX 365 овать ующая .
SFX 365 овать ующей .
SFX 365 овать ующей .
SFX 365 овать ующую .
SFX 365 овать ующей .
SFX 365 овать ующею .
SFX 365 овать ующей .
SFX 365 овать ующее .
SFX 365 овать ующего .
SFX 365 овать ующему .
SFX 365 овать ующее .
SFX 365 овать ующим .
SFX 365 овать ующем .
SFX 365 овать ующие .
SFX 365 овать ующих .
SFX 365 овать ующим .
SFX 365 овать ующих .
SFX 365 овать ующие .
SFX 365 овать ующими .
SFX 365 овать ующих .
SFX 365 овать овавший .
SFX 365 овать овавшего .
SFX 365 овать овавшему .
SFX 365 овать овавшего .
SFX 365 овать овавший .
SFX 365 овать овавшим .
SFX 365 овать овавшем .
SFX 365 овать овавшая .
SFX 365 овать овавшей .
SFX 365 овать овавшей .
SFX 365 овать овавшую .
SFX 365 овать овавшей .
SFX 365 овать овавшею .
SFX 365 овать овавшей .
SFX 365 овать овавшее .
SFX 365 овать овавшего .
SFX 365 овать овавшему .
SFX 365 овать овавшее .
SFX 365 овать овавшим .
SFX 365 овать овавшем .
SFX 365 овать овавшие .
SFX 365 овать овавших .
SFX 365 овать овавшим .
SFX 365 овать овавших .
SFX 365 овать овавшие .
SFX 365 овать овавшими .
SFX 365 овать овавших .
SFX 365 овать уемый .
SFX 365 овать уемого .
SFX 365 овать уемому .
SFX 365 овать уемого .
SFX 365 овать уемый .
SFX 365 овать уемым .
SFX 365 овать уемом .
SFX 365 овать уем .
SFX 365 овать уемая .
SFX 365 овать уемой .
SFX 365 овать уемой .
SFX 365 овать уемую .
SFX 365 овать уемой .
SFX 365 овать уемою .
SFX 365 овать уемой .
SFX 365 овать уема .
SFX 365 овать уемое .
SFX 365 овать уемого .
SFX 365 овать уемому .
SFX 365 овать уемое .
SFX 365 овать уемым .
SFX 365 овать уемом .
SFX 365 овать уемо .
SFX 365 овать уемые .
SFX 365 овать уемых .
SFX 365 овать уемым .
SFX 365 овать уемых .
SFX 365 овать уемые .
SFX 365 овать уемыми .
SFX 365 овать уемых .
SFX 365 овать уемы .
SFX 365 овать ованный .
SFX 365 овать ованного .
SFX 365 овать ованному .
SFX 365 овать ованного .
SFX 365 овать ованный .
SFX 365 овать ованным .
SFX 365 овать ованном .
SFX 365 овать ован .
SFX 365 овать ованная .
SFX 365 овать ованной .
SFX 365 овать ованной .
SFX 365 овать ованную .
SFX 365 овать ованной .
SFX 365 овать ованною .
SFX 365 овать ованной .
SFX 365 овать ована .
SFX 365 овать ованное .
SFX 365 овать ованного .
SFX 365 овать ованному .
SFX 365 овать ованное .
SFX 365 овать ованным .
SFX 365 овать ованном .
SFX 365 овать овано .
SFX 365 овать ованные .
SFX 365 овать ованных .
SFX 365 овать ованным .
SFX 365 овать ованных .
SFX 365 овать ованные .
SFX 365 овать ованными .
SFX 365 овать ованных .
SFX 365 овать ованы .
SFX 365 овать 0 .

SFX 366 Y 12
SFX 366 ый ее ый
SFX 366 ый ей ый
SFX 366 е й ее
SFX 366 ь я ь
SFX 366 ь ю ь
SFX 366 ь ём ь
SFX 366 ь е ь
SFX 366 я и я
SFX 366 я е [^и]я
SFX 366 я ю я
SFX 366 я ёй я
SFX 366 я ёю я

SFX 367 Y 25
SFX 367 ие ие .
SFX 367 ие ье .
SFX 367 ие ия .
SFX 367 ие ья .
SFX 367 ие ию .
SFX 367 ие ью .
SFX 367 ие ие .
SFX 367 ие ье .
SFX 367 ие ием .
SFX 367 ие ьем .
SFX 367 ие ии .
SFX 367 ие ье .
SFX 367 ие ьи .
SFX 367 ие ия .
SFX 367 ие ья .
SFX 367 ие ий .
SFX 367 ие иям .
SFX 367 ие ьям .
SFX 367 ие ия .
SFX 367 ие ья .
SFX 367 ие иями .
SFX 367 ие ьями .
SFX 367 ие иях .
SFX 367 ие ьях .
SFX 367 ие ующий .

SFX 368 Y 25
SFX 368 ие ие .
SFX 368 ие ье .
SFX 368 ие ия .
SFX 368 ие ья .
SFX 368 ие ию .
SFX 368 ие ью .
SFX 368 ие ие .
SFX 368 ие ье .
SFX 368 ие ием .
SFX 368 ие ьем .
SFX 368 ие ии .
SFX 368 ие ье .
SFX 368 ие ьи .
SFX 368 ие ия .
SFX 368 ие ья .
SFX 368 ие ий .
SFX 368 ие иям .
SFX 368 ие ьям .
SFX 368 ие ия .
SFX 368 ие ья .
SFX 368 ие иями .
SFX 368 ие ьями .
SFX 368 ие иях .
SFX 368 ие ьях .
SFX 368 ие ующий .

SFX 369 Y 20
SFX 369 ь и ь
SFX 369 0 ю ь
SFX 369 а ой а
SFX 369 а у а
SFX 369 ая ой ая
SFX 369 ая ую ая
SFX 369 ок ка нок
SFX 369 ок ку нок
SFX 369 ок ком нок
SFX 369 ок ке нок
SFX 369 енок ята енок
SFX 369 онок ата онок
SFX 369 енок ят енок
SFX 369 онок ат онок
SFX 369 енок ятам енок
SFX 369 онок атам онок
SFX 369 енок ятами енок
SFX 369 онок атами онок
SFX 369 енок ятах енок
SFX 369 онок атах онок

SFX 370 Y 13
SFX 370 0  .
SFX 370 0 а .
SFX 370 0 у .
SFX 370 0  .
SFX 370 0 ем .
SFX 370 0 е .
SFX 370 0 и .
SFX 370 0 ей .
SFX 370 0 ам .
SFX 370 0 и .
SFX 370 0 ами .
SFX 370 0 ах .
SFX 370 0 ьи .

SFX 371 Y 13
SFX 371 0  .
SFX 371 0 а .
SFX 371 0 у .
SFX 371 0  .
SFX 371 0 ем .
SFX 371 0 е .
SFX 371 0 и .
SFX 371 0 ей .
SFX 371 0 ам .
SFX 371 0 и .
SFX 371 0 ами .
SFX 371 0 ах .
SFX 371 0 ьи .

SFX 372 Y 25
SFX 372   ь    и            ь
SFX 372   онок атами        онок
SFX 372   онок атам         онок
SFX 372   онок атах         онок
SFX 372   онок ата          онок
SFX 372   онок ат           онок
SFX 372   ок   ку           нок
SFX 372   ок   ком          нок
SFX 372   ок   ке           нок
SFX 372   ок   ка           нок
SFX 372   енок ятами        енок
SFX 372   енок ятам         енок
SFX 372   енок ятах         енок
SFX 372   енок ята          енок
SFX 372   енок ят           енок
SFX 372   ая   ую           ая
SFX 372   ая   ой           ая
SFX 372   а    у            а
SFX 372   а    ой           а
SFX 372   ёнок ятами        ёнок
SFX 372   ёнок ятам         ёнок
SFX 372   ёнок ятах         ёнок
SFX 372   ёнок ята          ёнок
SFX 372   ёнок ят           ёнок
SFX 372   0    ю            ь

SFX 373 Y 13
SFX 373 й й .
SFX 373 й я .
SFX 373 й ю .
SFX 373 й й .
SFX 373 й ем .
SFX 373 й и .
SFX 373 й и .
SFX 373 й ев .
SFX 373 й ям .
SFX 373 й и .
SFX 373 й ями .
SFX 373 й ях .
SFX 373 й ьи .

SFX 374 Y 13
SFX 374 й й .
SFX 374 й я .
SFX 374 й ю .
SFX 374 й й .
SFX 374 й ем .
SFX 374 й и .
SFX 374 й и .
SFX 374 й ев .
SFX 374 й ям .
SFX 374 й и .
SFX 374 й ями .
SFX 374 й ях .
SFX 374 й ьи .

SFX 375 Y 20
SFX 375 ь и ь
SFX 375 0 ю ь
SFX 375 а ой а
SFX 375 а у а
SFX 375 ая ой ая
SFX 375 ая ую ая
SFX 375 ок ка нок
SFX 375 ок ку нок
SFX 375 ок ком нок
SFX 375 ок ке нок
SFX 375 ёнок ята ёнок
SFX 375 онок ата онок
SFX 375 ёнок ят ёнок
SFX 375 онок ат онок
SFX 375 ёнок ятам ёнок
SFX 375 онок атам онок
SFX 375 ёнок ятами ёнок
SFX 375 онок атами онок
SFX 375 ёнок ятах ёнок
SFX 375 онок атах онок

SFX 376 Y 13
SFX 376 а а .
SFX 376 а и .
SFX 376 а е .
SFX 376 а у .
SFX 376 а ей .
SFX 376 а е .
SFX 376 а и .
SFX 376 а 0 .
SFX 376 а ам .
SFX 376 а  .
SFX 376 а ами .
SFX 376 а ах .
SFX 376 а ьи .

SFX 377 Y 13
SFX 377 а а .
SFX 377 а и .
SFX 377 а е .
SFX 377 а у .
SFX 377 а ей .
SFX 377 а е .
SFX 377 а и .
SFX 377 а 0 .
SFX 377 а ам .
SFX 377 а  .
SFX 377 а ами .
SFX 377 а ах .
SFX 377 а ьи .

SFX 378 Y 24
SFX 378 e ing [^eioy]e
SFX 378 0 ing [eoy]e
SFX 378 ie ying ie
SFX 378 0 bing [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX 378 0 king [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 378 0 ding [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX 378 0 fing [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX 378 0 ging [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX 378 0 king [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX 378 0 ling [^aeio][eiou]l
SFX 378 0 ing [aeio][eiou]l
SFX 378 0 ling [^aeo]al
SFX 378 0 ing [aeo]al
SFX 378 0 ming [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX 378 0 ning [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX 378 0 ping [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX 378 0 ring [^aeio][aeiou]r
SFX 378 0 sing [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX 378 0 ting [^aeio][aeiou]t
SFX 378 0 ving [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX 378 0 zing [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX 378 0 ing [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz]
SFX 378 0 ing [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 378 0 ing [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz]

SFX 379 Y 13
SFX 379 ие ие .
SFX 379 ие ье .
SFX 379 ие ия .
SFX 379 ие ья .
SFX 379 ие ию .
SFX 379 ие ью .
SFX 379 ие ие .
SFX 379 ие ье .
SFX 379 ие ием .
SFX 379 ие ьем .
SFX 379 ие ии .
SFX 379 ие ье .
SFX 379 ие ьи .

SFX 380 Y 13
SFX 380 ие ие .
SFX 380 ие ье .
SFX 380 ие ия .
SFX 380 ие ья .
SFX 380 ие ию .
SFX 380 ие ью .
SFX 380 ие ие .
SFX 380 ие ье .
SFX 380 ие ием .
SFX 380 ие ьем .
SFX 380 ие ии .
SFX 380 ие ье .
SFX 380 ие ьи .

SFX 381 Y 2
SFX 381   e     ing        e
SFX 381   0     ing        [^e]

SFX 382 Y 7
SFX 382 ь ь .
SFX 382 ь я .
SFX 382 ь ю .
SFX 382 ь ь .
SFX 382 ь ем .
SFX 382 ь е .
SFX 382 ь ие .

SFX 383 Y 7
SFX 383 ь ь .
SFX 383 ь я .
SFX 383 ь ю .
SFX 383 ь ь .
SFX 383 ь ем .
SFX 383 ь е .
SFX 383 ь ие .
